Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201358-864
Nebraska Student Loan Assistance Program; authority; powers.

The authority may:

(1) Make loans to private institutions of higher education
to assist such institutions in providing loans to their full-time students
to assist them in financing the cost of their education while taking courses
leading to an academic degree;

(2) Participate in the financing of such loans;

(3) Sell or participate in the sale of such loans;

(4) Collect and pay reasonable fees and charges in connection
with the exercise of the powers provided in subdivisions (1) through (3) of
this section;

(5) Do all things necessary and convenient to carry out the
purposes of this section and section 58-865 in connection with
the administering of such loans, including contracting with any person, firm,
or other body, public or private;

(6) Enter into any agreements necessary to effect the guarantee,
insuring, or administering of such loans;

(7) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing
and establish standards for participation in the Nebraska Student Loan Assistance
Program; and

(8) Exercise all powers incidental to or necessary for the
performance of the powers authorized by this section.

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 35;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2962;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 61;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1761;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 64.